Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2701.20
Member states, defined.

Member states means any and all states that have been approved initially or later admitted by the governing board for participation in the streamlined sales and use tax agreement.

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 24.